Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1475
Revisor of Statutes; crimes categorized; duties.

The Revisor of Statutes shall place in the Appendix to the Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska a list of all crimes which have been categorized pursuant to sections 28-105 and 28-106. An updated list shall be included in the annual supplement to the statutes.

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 58;

Laws 1995, LB 589, § 5.